Utah statutes.
78B-6-1239.   Distribution of securities to parties entitled.
If security is taken by the referees on a sale, and the parties interested in
the security, by an instrument in writing delivered to the referees, agree
upon the shares and proportions to which they are respectively entitled, or
when shares and proportions have been previously adjudged by the court, the
securities shall be taken in the names of, and payable to, the parties
respectively entitled, and shall be delivered to the parties upon their
receipt.  The agreement and receipt shall be filed with the clerk of the
court.
